Hawaii, session 2025, SB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that additional in-person voting locations are necessary to accommodate voters who choose to vote in person.  An absence of available voter service centers has resulted in long lines and frustrated voters remaining in line to vote beyond the official closing time.  Delays and long waits may discourage voters from turning out as some voters may decide that it is not worth waiting in line to cast their ballots. The legislature further finds that ensuring access to voting in all of its forms, by mail, absentee, and in-person, is essential to ensuring the health of our democracy.  The legislature also finds that some geographic areas with high voter turn-out are also home to underserved communities that would benefit from more accessible voting service centers. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to establish three additional voting service centers in a county with a population of more than five hundred thousand to improve the accessibility and overall experience of voting. SECTION 2.  Section 11-109, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Voter service centers shall be established by the clerks to service the particular needs of each county's voters.  For a county with a population of more than five hundred thousand, the clerks shall establish three additional voter service centers; provided that the new voter service centers shall be located in highly populated and underserved areas within the county; provided further that the office of elections: (1)  Shall consult with local communities, civic organizations, and elected representatives to determine the optimal locations for the new voter service centers; and (2)  Shall submit an annual report to the legislature detailing the locations, accessibility, and use of the new voter service centers." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________